Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Chapter 50. Anatomical Gifts Registry.

Cross references. —

For provisions governing anatomical gifts on and after January 1, 2005, see AS 13.52.
For authority giving continuing effect to an anatomical gift made under AS

13.50.010

- 13.50.090 in effect on January 1, 2005, until the instrument of donation is revoked, see § 16(a), ch. 83, SLA 2004 in the 2004 Temporary and Special Acts.

Secs. 13.50.010 — 13.50.090.
Uniform Anatomical Gift Act. [Repealed, § 15 ch 83 SLA 2004. For current law, see AS 13.52.]

Sec. 13.50.100.
Transfer of information.

Except for information on a motor vehicle or identification document issued to a donor who declines to participate in a registry, when a person who applies for a motor vehicle or identification document makes a gift with the application, the department shall electronically transfer all information that appears on the front of the motor vehicle or identification document and any changes that are subsequently received by the department from the donor to a procurement organization that intends to establish a donor registry under AS

13.50.110

.

A donor to whom a motor vehicle or identification document is issued is not required to participate in a registry, and the department may not transfer information under (a) of this section from a donor who declines to participate in a registry.

History.

(§ 3 ch 68 SLA 2004)

Sec. 13.50.110.
Use of transferred information.

A procurement organization that obtains information under AS

13.50.100

shall use the information to establish a statewide donor registry accessible by a recognized organization in

this state that handles the recovery or placement of parts of the body; and

another state that handles the recovery or placement of parts of the body when a donor who is a resident of this state is not located in this state at the time of or immediately before death.

A procurement organization may not

use registry information for fund raising; or

disseminate information obtained under AS

13.50.100

unless authorized by this section or by federal law.

A procurement organization may disseminate information obtained under AS

13.50.100

to another procurement organization.

History.

(§ 3 ch 68 SLA 2004)

Sec. 13.50.120.
Acquisition of other donor information.

A procurement organization may acquire donor information from sources other than the department.

History.

(§ 3 ch 68 SLA 2004)

Sec. 13.50.130.
Registry costs.

A procurement organization that has requested registry information from the department shall pay the reasonable costs associated with the creation by the organization of a registry and the reasonable costs associated with the initial installation and establishment of the facilities necessary for electronic transfer of the donor information to the organization by the department.

After the initial transfer of information under (a) of this section, the department shall make all transfers of donor information without charge to a procurement organization.

History.

(§ 3 ch 68 SLA 2004)

Sec. 13.50.140.
Notification of cancellation.

A donor whose motor vehicle or identification document information is on a registry shall notify a procurement organization or the department of the destruction or mutilation of the motor vehicle or identification document or revocation of the gift under AS

13.52.183

in order to remove the donor’s name from a registry. If the procurement organization that is notified does not maintain a registry, the organization shall notify all procurement organizations that do maintain a registry.

The failure of a donor to make the notification under (a) of this section does not affect the revocation of a gift under AS

13.52.183

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 68 SLA 2004; am § 4 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “AS

13.52.170

” was substituted for “AS 13.50.050” to reconcile chs. 68 and 83, SLA 2004.

Sec. 13.50.150.
Monetary donation program.

An applicant for a motor vehicle or identification document may donate $1 or more to the fund to promote in the state the donation of body parts under AS 13.52 (Health Care Decisions Act). The donation is voluntary and may be declined by the applicant. The department shall make available to all applicants information on the importance of making gifts.

The department shall collect the donations made under (a) of this section and credit the donations to the fund. At least quarterly, the department shall transfer the donations to the fund.

The department shall ask each applicant for a motor vehicle or identification document whether the applicant is interested in making the donation under (a) of this section.

Each procurement organization shall pay its proportionate share of the reasonable costs associated with the creation of the donation program created under this section, unless another amount is agreed to by the department.

History.

(§ 3 ch 68 SLA 2004; am § 5 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “AS 13.52 (Health Care Decisions Act)” was substituted for “AS

13.50.010

— 13.50.090 (Uniform Anatomical Gift Act)” in subsection (a) in order to reconcile chs. 68 and 83, SLA 2004.

Sec. 13.50.160.
Anatomical gift awareness fund.

The anatomical gift awareness fund is established. The fund consists of all donations made under AS

13.50.150

, other donations to the fund for a purpose identified under (b) of this section, money received by the department under AS

13.50.130

, and appropriations made to the fund.

The purposes of the fund are to promote gifts in the state under AS 13.52 and to administer the donation program established under AS

13.50.150

.

[Repealed, § 6 ch 46 SLA 2007.]

Money in the fund may be appropriated by the legislature to an organization for the purpose of promoting the donation programs established in AS 13.50 and AS 13.52.

Money appropriated to the fund may be spent for the purposes of the fund without further appropriation. Money appropriated to the fund does not lapse.

History.

(§ 3 ch 68 SLA 2004; am §§ 1, 6 ch 46 SLA 2007; am §§ 6, 7 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “AS 13.52” was substituted for “AS

13.50.010

— 13.50.090” in subsection (b) in order to reconcile chs. 68 and 83, SLA 2004.

Sec. 13.50.170.
Penalty.

A person who knowingly violates AS

13.50.110(b)(1)

or (2) is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 3 ch 68 SLA 2004)

Sec. 13.50.190.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“department” means the Department of Administration;

“donation” means a monetary donation made under AS

13.50.150

;

“donor” has the meaning given in AS

13.52.268

;

“fund” means the anatomical gift awareness fund established under AS

13.50.160

;

“gift” means an anatomical gift; in this paragraph, “anatomical gift” has the meaning given in AS

13.52.390

;

“motor vehicle or identification document” means

a motor vehicle registration, a driver’s license, or an instruction permit, or a renewal of the registration, license, or permit; or

an identification card issued under AS

18.65.310

;

“part” has the meaning given in AS

13.52.390

;

“procurement organization” has the meaning given in AS

13.52.268

;

“reasonable costs” includes the cost of

computer programming and installing software and software upgrades;

employee training that is specific to a registry or the donation program established under AS

13.50.150

;

producing literature that is specific to a registry or the donation program established under AS

13.50.150

; and

making hardware upgrades or handling other issues for a registry or the donation program established under AS 13.50.150;

“registry” means a donor registry established under AS

13.50.110

;

“registry information” means information obtained under AS

13.50.100

;

“state” means a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

History.

(§ 3 ch 68 SLA 2004; am §§ 1, 2 ch 44 SLA 2005; am §§ 8, 9 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraphs (3), (5), and (7) were enacted as paragraphs (10) — (12); renumbered in 2005 to maintain the terms in alphabetical order, at which time former paragraphs (3), (4), and (5) — (9) were renumbered as (4), (6), and (8) — (12), respectively.